Massachusetts, session 194th, H3033.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, Section 12 of chapter 64A of the General Laws,
is hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:-
"Any sale of fuel for automotive use, including but not limited to unleaded gasoline and
diesel fuel, by a distributor to any public or private entity, or private person in the
commonwealth shall be exempt from the tax per gallon contained in this chapter until such time
as the average price of a gallon of unleaded gasoline, as calculated in the Commonwealth of
Massachusetts by the U.S. Energy Information Administration, is less than one dollar and zero
cents."
of 1